Illinois, session 104th, SB1326.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 16-170 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/16-170)7    Sec. 16-170. Hearings. 8    (a) A hearing shall be granted if any party to the appeal 9so requests, and, upon motion of any party to the appeal or by 10direction of the Property Tax Appeal Board, any appeal may be 11set down for a hearing, with proper notice to the interested 12parties. Notice to all interested taxing bodies shall be 13deemed to have been given when served upon the State's 14Attorney of the county from which the appeal has been taken. 15Hearings may be held before less than a majority of the members 16of the Board, and the chairman may assign members or hearing 17officers to hold hearings. Such hearings shall be open to the 18public and shall be conducted in accordance with the rules of 19practice and procedure promulgated by the Board. The Board, 20any member or hearing officer may require the production of 21any books, records, papers or documents that may be material 22or relevant as evidence in any matter pending before it and 23necessary for the making of a just decision.   SB1326- 2 -LRB104 02974 HLH 12991 b1    (b) In counties with a population of more than 700,000 2residents and fewer than 725,000 residents according to the 3most recent federal decennial census, upon motion of any party 4and provided that other parties to the appeal do not object, 5the hearing described in this Section shall be heard online 6with parties to the appeal participating in the hearing 7remotely. A party that participates remotely in a hearing as 8provided in this subsection (b) shall be considered present 9for purposes of the hearing. Within 60 days after the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 11Assembly, the Board shall amend the rules of practice and 12procedure adopted by the Board to accommodate online hearings 13required by this Section. 14(Source: P.A. 76-689; 88-455.) 15    Section 10. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 16amended by adding Section 5-45.62 as follows: 17    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.62 new)18    Sec. 5-45.62. Emergency rulemaking; Property Tax Appeal 19Board. To provide for the expeditious and timely 20implementation of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly, emergency rules implementing this amendatory Act may 22be adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 by the Property Tax 23Appeal Board. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by 24Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be necessary for the   SB1326- 3 -LRB104 02974 HLH 12991 b1public interest, safety, and welfare. 2    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 3of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.